WinSxS/amd64_microsoft-windows-a..ty-braille-liblouis_31bf3856ad364e35_10.0.22621.1_none_3f320d4f4bbdd98f/hyph_brl_da_dk.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 1
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 1
.abs2
.4a
.ab4
.ag4t3
.a2g
.agte4
.agt5e2r
.akte4
.a2k4
.a2kt
.and2
.a4n
.a4n3de
.an5do
.an3d4r
.a2n2s2
.aris2
.a6r
.as2ku
.ask4
.as1th
.ast2
.as2t4i
.as2t4r
.4av4e2r4a
.av1er
.be4n3e2n2
.b4
.b4e3ne4
.ben2
.be2n2s2
.b2e3r4a
.b2e5r4o
.bre2ds4
.br2ed
.d4
.d4e2ri.
.d2e1ri
.de2rib4
.d4e2rig
.di3g4r
.dis2t4
.do5ri
.1eft5
.ef4
.eks1te
.e4k4
.ekst2
.ekst3er4n
.ekst1e2r
.els2
.2el4
.e2nab4
.en2
.2e1n4a
.e2na6r
.e3n4e2n2
.4e1ne
.en4gs2
.en2g
.2e1nu
.2e2næ
.2e2nø4
.2e3r4a
.e4ra6r
.2e3ri
.2e1ru
.2es2
.e2s3s
.2e3tu
.2e2tå4
.ev4e3ni
.2ev
.ev1en2
.for6en4d
.f4
.fo2r5en2
.fo1re
.g4ef4
.g1e
.g3e2n2
.g4e3r4o
.g2e1ru
.g4es2
.gje2
.gj4
.h4e2ri.
.h4e
.h2e1ri
.hud1end
.hude2n2
.hv1e2p4
.in2d4r
.i4n
.ind2
.in2ds2
.iris1
.i4r
.is1k4
.is1t4o
.ist4
.is3t4y4
.je2t
.j4
.klav3
.k4
.kl4
.kl4a
.lag3er
.l4
.l4a
.la2g
.lag1e
.l2e1r5a
.le2t
.li1g4a2
.li3g1e
.li2g4ej4
.lus2
.lære5r1en2
.lære2
.lær4e4re
.lær1e2r
.med1ej4
.m2ed
.m2e4k4
.m4e4re
.m1er
.m5ere4k4
.m3e2ri4n
.m2e1ri
.m3e1r4o
.m3eru
.mis1k4
.nas2
.n4a
.n1d
.ne2
.n4ed
.ne2ds2
.n4e4k4
.n3e3n4y4
.n1e2n2
.n2e3ru
.n1er
.n3e1t4a
.n1et
.ne4tils
.n4e3t4i
.n6etil4
.n3eto2p4
.2n2e1t4o
.n3e1t4r
.4n3e1tu
.nu4r4
.odels3
.od2el4
.om2s2
.on4e
.o2n
.ops2
.o2p4
.o3re
.o3r4o
.os2
.o2s3s
.ov3
.ov5e4
.p4e3te4
.2p4
.pet3e2r
.re2ds4
.r2ed
.r4em
.re2na4n
.r1en2
.r4e1n4a
.r4e4ne
.r3e1tø4
.r1et
.ris1kos
.risk4
.rus2k4
.s4
.se1no
.s4e
.sen2
.s2e5r4a
.s2e5r4o
.somm5er
.s2o
.st4
.sto2ris
.st4o
.sto1ri
.sv5e1ne
.s2v
.sve2
.sv1en2
.2t6ed
.t4el4
.t4em
.t4e1re
.t1e2r
.to3ri
.t4o
.to3r4o
.tr2e3n2ds
.t4r
.tre2
.tr1en2
.u2ds2
.ufo2
.uf4
.uke3
.u2k4
.un1d4r
.u2n
.une3
.ups2
.u2p4
.us2
.va2rs2
.v4a
.va6r
.v5e.
.v1e4g.
.ve4g
.v3ei.
.v2ei
.v1ej.
.vej4
.v1ej4e.
.ve4n3e2n2
.v1en2
.v4e1ne
.ve4n3e2r.
.ven3er
.ve2n3er4n
.v2e3r4a
.v1er
.yd4
.4y4
.æ4gs2
.æg2
.æn1
.æt3e4
.æ2t
.øs4
.ø4
4a
aabe2
4a4a
aab4
aah2
abg2
ab4
abs3k4
ad3elen2es2
ad2el4
adelen2
adel4e1ne
ad3eli2t
ad2e5re
ad2e3r4o
adron4n
ad4r
adr4o
adro2n
4ads1t4a
a2ds
adst2
adu2n1
ae1no
aen2
a2e3r4o
a2e1ru
a2es2
ae3th
4a1f4a
af4
a1fe
a1fi
afiks2
afi2k4
a1fo
afo3re
a1fri
afs2k4
a1f4y4
a1fø4
a2g
agas2
ag4a
4ag2e3n4a
ag1e
age2n2
agens1k4
age2n2s
agens3ki
4ag3e1r4a
age2ra4n
ag4e3ras
age2r1e2r
ag2e1re
age2r3e2ts
ag4er1et
age2ri4n
ag2e1ri
ag5e1r4o
ag2erå4
ag4e4te
ag4e1tå4
ags3t4e.
a4gs
ags1t2
ags2te
ags3t2e4e
ag2s3t4es
agt1eks
ag4t
agte4k4
ahun4n
ahu2n
ah1v
ai3g
ai5g4r
ain3ev
ai4n
ais2k4
ajo2n5
aj4
ajs1k4
a2k4
ake4t
ak4e3t3e
aks2ku
aksk4
ak4t1e4k4
a2kt
ale3ra2p4
al4
4al2e1r4a
al2e3tu
alle2ru2n
all4
all2e1ru
alov3
alove4
als1kild
alsk4
alskil4
am2e2n2d.
am1en2
4am4e1r4a
am1er
am2e1ru
am2e5t4r
ams2te
am2s
amst2
a4n
anav4
4an4a
anave3
an2da2p4
4an1d4a
and1e4g2n
a4n1de
ande4g
and1eje
andej4
and5eros
and2e1r4o
and1erst2
ande2rs
an1d4r
an3dr4y4
and2s1ka6r
an2ds
andsk4
andsk4a
ands3ti4n
andst2
andst4i
an2dær
an1dæ
an4døs
an3dø4
an2e1ru
an1er
an3eu4r
an2eu
ang2e4g6
an2g
ang1e
4ang3e1r4a
anis2t6
an5n4e4k4
an1n
ans2k4
a2n2s
ans3ka2p4
ansk4a
ans3kor
ans1ko
ans1tor
anst2
anst4o
4ans1tr4a
anst4r
aome2
aos1t4
aov3
aove4
apag1e3
a2p4
ap4a
apa2g
ape2t
a6r
ar1e2kt
are4k4
ar4em
ar4eru
ar1e2r
ar3e1t4r
ar1et
arg1e2
ar2g
arg3e4n2
arg4r2
arms2t2
arm2s
arome4
ar4o
a2rom
ars3k4o2k4
a2rs
arsk4
ars1kr2
arts1t2
ar4t
ar2ts
as2e5ri
as4e
ash1v
as2h
a2s1ka6r
ask4
ask4a
as3klæ
a2s1kl4
as1kol4
4as3kr4a
askr2
as1ku
as2kv
a2s1kæ
as2kær
as1kød
askø4
as2te3rå4
ast2
ast1e2r
astos1
ast4o
as1tr4y4
ast4r
as2tu
as4tul4
as1tør
astø4
a2t
at1ef4f4
atef4
at2e4g
a2t1ej4
atekspr2es2
ate4k4
ateks2p4
a2t4e5ne
at1en2
at6e5re2n.
at1e2r
at4e3r1en2
at2e1re
ate4r2erf4
ater1e2r
at4e5rin2g
at2e3ri
ateri4n
at4eu
at3ev
ati2n2s2
at4i
ati4n
ato1rud2
at4o
at2ros1t4
at4r
atr4o
ats1k2el4
a2ts
atsk4
ats1tj4
atst2
ats1tæ
att3era4n
a2t2t
att1e2r
4att2e3r4a
aue2n2
aun1d
au2n
aus2t2
av3e2dd4
av2ed
av5en3er
av1en2
av4e1ne
av3e3ni
av2e3no
4av3e2r4a
av1er
ave4ra4n
av4e2r1e2r
av2e1re
ave2r3e2ts
av4er1et
av2e3ri
ave1rud2
av2eru
av2e3rø4
avs1ko
av4s
avsk4
avs1t1e2r
avst2
4avs1tr4a
avst4r
avs5tu
ays2
a4y4
á1l4
à1
ä1de
ä1di
ä1g
ä1k4
ä1le
äl4
äls2
ämme1
än1
ä1ne
äpo3
ä2p4
ä1s
ä2s2l4
äst1e2r4
äst2
â1
b4
ba4gs4
b4a
ba2g
bals1k4
bal4
b4an3d4a
ba4n
bas1to2n
bast2
bast4o
bdy2rs3
bd4y4
b2e4e2
bels2k4
b2el4
be3na2k4
ben2
b2e1n4a
be2na4n
be1n4d4r
b4e3ne4
b4e5n4e1ne
be3n3e2n2
ben5e3th
ben3et
be1no
be5ra2k4
b2e1r4a
be3ra2p4
be2rast2
b4e3r4e.
b2e1re
be3r2e2c2
be2r1e2p4
ber3ev
b4e3ri.
b2e1ri
b4e3ri4e
berne4
ber4n
b6e3rol4
b2e1r4o
be3rov
b2e1ru
be2rø.
be1rø4
be3rå4
b2es2
b2e3t4a
b2e3t4o
b2e3t4r
be1tv
b2e1tw
bhave2
bh4a
bid4
bl2e3r4a
bl4
blo3te
blo2t
boli2g4a
bol4
bon5ne
bo2n
bon1n
bo3r4a
bo4ra2k4
bo3r4o
bor2ts2
bor4t
bo1ru
bo1rå4
br4em
b2rov2
br4o
brud3end
brud2
brude2n2
bs1k4
b2s3kam
bsk4a
b2s3kl4
bs1t2
bs2ta2t
bst4a
bs3til4
bst4i
bs2to2p4
bst4o
bs2t4r
bs3tr4o
bs3træ
budg5
buds3k4y4
buds2k4
bu2ds
bu2es2
bu2s2ka6r
busk4
busk4a
bu2s1s2
bus1t4r
bust2
bü1
bæv3
bør4n4
bø4
børs1k4
bø2rs
børs1t4r
børst2
båd1end
bå4
båden2
2c2
cas2t2
c4a
cath4e3
ca2t
ccis1
c2c2
c4e1ne2
cen2
cen4el4
ce1no
cent3e2r
ce2n4t
c2e1nu
c2e3r4a
c2e5re
cer4ed
cer2es1
c2e3r4o
ce4rov
cers3k4a
ce2rs
cersk4
ce1rå4
ces1tæ
c2es
cest4
ch1v
cin3d4r
ci4n
cind2
cine2
co2n2s2
co2n
co3ri
co1ru
co3r4y4
cr2
creas1
cr4e4a
cr3en2
cros2
cr4o
ct2
ct3e2r.
ct1e2r
ct3e2rs
ct3et
cys2
c4y4
2d.
2dad
d4a
3dadi
3dado
2daf4
3da1fe
3da1fi
4dafl4
3da1fo
da1fr
dag1e2
da2g
dag3ele
dag2el4
2dager
4dagt4i
dag4t
2dai4r
2daks
da2k4
2daktu
da2kt
2dala6r
dal4
dal4a
2dalv
damme4
2dan2d.
da4n
dan5di
2dan2k4
2da2nl4
2dano
2danst2
da2n2s
2dans2v
dan2ts2
da2n4t
4darb4
da6r
2d4ar4e4a
4dar4r
2dar4t
date4
da2t
dat1e4k4
2da2tl4
2datte
da2t2t
2dau4t
2davl4
dä2
2d2c2
2dd4
dd2e2r4a
d1ef4f4
def4
2d1eft
2degne
de4g
de4g2n
d2ej.
dej4
2dejen2
d1eks
de4k4
2deks2i
deks1t2
2d3el2em
d2el4
del4s1til4
delst2
delst4i
2d3emalj4
d2em
dem4a
demal4
d3emb4
2d3emf4
de4nam
den2
d2e1n4a
de3nav
d3e1n2d2t
d4e3ne
2d5e3ner2g
den3er
de4n3eu
2den4g.
den2g
2d1eng1e
2den4gs
2denh4e
den4ne
den1n
de1no
dens1t2
de2n2s
dent3e
de2n4t
2d1entu
d2e1nu
de2nå4
deog5e
d4eo
deo2g
de3ra2p4
d2e1r4a
de3rej4
d2e1re
de3r2el4
de2ren2g
de3r1en2
de2r3ev4n
der2ev
4derfa6r
derf4
derf4a
d4erm
de5ro1re
d2e1r4o
de4ror
2deros2i
d4eros
d4e3rovi
de2rov
2derst4a
de2rs
derst2
de1run4n
d2eru
deru2n
2derupt
de3ru2p4
d4e1ræ
de2røn
de1rø4
de1råb4
derå4
des2kr4a
d2es
d4eskr2
desk4
desove5
des2o
des3tab.
dest4
des2t4a
destab4
des3ta2g
d3e3ta2t
d2e1t4a
de4th
d2e3t4r
d2e3tu
d2e2tå4
dev1en4
d2ev
d3ev4n
dfo3r5en2
df4
dfo1re
dfr4
dfæ2rs1
dgangs3t2
dg4a
dga4n
dgan2g
dgan4gs
dg3e2
dg4ed2
dg4el4
dg4em
dg2e4tæ
1dhi.
dhø2rs1
dhø4
2dide
did4
4didé
4did4y4
dig3et
di1g1e
di2g2e1t4a
di2gl4
2dim
4dim2p4
4dind2
di4n
4di2n2s
4di2n4t
dis3kul4
disk4
dis1til4
dist4
dist4i
1dj2el4
dj4
1dji
2djiv
d2k4
3dle3to2n
dl4
dl2e1t4o
dmels1
dm2el4
d2n
dn2etv
dn1et
2dod
4do2dd4
4dof4
2do2g
6do4g.
6do4gs
4dom4r
doms1k4
dom2s
6domskr2
doms1t4a
domst6
4donke
do2n
don2k4
4do2p4
5dopo
do3r4a
6dord
do3r2et
do1re
4dor2g
4dorm
do3r4o
do1ræ
do1rå4
6dote
do2t
4dou4t
4dove
dov2ej4
dplane4
d2p4
dpl4
dpl4a
dpla4n
d4r
drabs3t2
d2rabs
dr4a
drab4
2dra2c2
2drad
2dram
2dra4n
2d2ra2p4
3drape
2drat4i
dra2t
dratione2
dratio2n
dr2ef4
2dre4g
2drej4
3d2reje
3dr2ejo
3dremi
dr2em
drem2s1
dr2e2p4
dr1e4r
dr3e1r4a
dr5er2ef4
dr4e1re
2dres4e
dr2es
2dr3e2t4n
dr1et
2dr3e2t2t
3dr2e3t4y4
2drevl4
dr2ev
1dré
2drid4
2drig
2dris
2drock4
dr4o
dro2c2
2drod
2drol4
1d2rom
2dro2s1s
3dross4e
2dro2t
2drove
d2rov
2drul4
2dr4y4
2dræ
3dræn
2drø4
drø2rs1
2ds
ds4kad
dsk4
dsk4a
ds1ka4n
ds2kan5n
ds3ka2p4
ds3kas
ds2kav
ds1kilde
dskil4
ds2ki4n
ds1ki2t
ds1kj4
d2s3kl4
ds1kn
ds1ko
dskommis2
ds1kom
ds3komm
ds1kr2
ds3kr4o
ds1ku4r
ds3kv
ds1kyl4l4
dsk4y4
dskyl4
ds1kys
ds1kæl4
d2skæ
ds1kæm
dsov3
ds2o
dsov1er2
dsove4
d2s1s2
ds3s2l4
ds1tab4
dst2
dst4a
ds1ta2k4
ds1tal4
ds1tas
ds1tat4o
dsta2t
ds1t4e4a
ds1t4el4
ds1tend
dst1en2
ds1t4eo
ds1t1e2r
dst3erm
d2s1t4es
d2s3tilf4
dst4i
dstil4
ds1t2ilst2
ds1tim
ds1ti2p4
ds1ti2t
ds1tj4
d2s1to2g
dst4o
ds1toi
ds1tom
ds1tr4a
dst4r
ds2tras2
ds1tr4o
ds1trå4
ds1tu
ds1tv
ds1tøj4
dstø4
2d2t
dte2
dt1ef4f4
dtef4
dt3en2
dt2e5ri
dt1e2r
dt3e3r4o
dte3rø4
dt5et
dt6e1t4a
dt3eu
dts1t4a
d2ts
dtst2
4dud
2dul4y4
dul4
4dund
du2n
2du2p4
2dure
du4r
2dur4t
dus2t2
dve2
4dyd
d4y4
4dynd
dyr5e3t4i
dyre2
dyr1et
dys1
2dæd
2dæ4g.
dæg2
4dø.
dø4
døds1t2
dø2ds
4døe
5døe2r.
4døj4
4døk4
4døl4
dørs1te
dø2rs
dørst2
4døv
4e.
4e4a
eam1
eas1ko
eask4
eat3e4
ea2t
4eb4
2e2c2
3ecchi4a
ec2c2
ecove2
2ed
ed1enh
eden2
ede2no
eder1e4g
ed2e1re
ed1erhv
4ed2es
edes1tæ
edest4
ed3eu4r
ed2eu
edi3g4r
eds1ke
e2ds
edsk4
eds1t4i
edst2
eds3ti4n
edt5en2
e2d2t
edte2
ed2ts2
2e4e
eeke1
ee4k4
ee2n2
e4e3ne
e2e3ni
e2e3ri
e2e1ru
ee2ru2n
e2es2
ee2th
4efo
ef4
1eft
eft3e4
e4g
2eg2el4
eg1e
eg3e2n2
eg5e4no
ege2r1e2r
eg2e1re
eg2e2ru
eg2n5e1r4a
e4g2n
egn1e2r
2egov
eg4o
e4gs2
2eh
3ehi2c2
ehu2ds1
2ei
eibs2
eib4
ei2ds2
eid4
eim2s1
ein2d4r
ei4n
eind2
eis2
4ej4a
ej4
1ej2c2
1ejdi.
4ejl4
2ejo
2ejs
4ejæ
e4k4
eken6
4ekl4
4ekn
4ek2s.
ek4s1k4
eks3ta2t
ekst2
ekst4a
eks3til4
eks1t4i
eks1tj4
eks1tri
ekst4r
ekte4
e2kt
e4k4t1e4k4
ekøn2
ekø4
2el4
4el.
elds2k4
el2ds
4el2ed
3el2em
4elem2p4
el2es2
el4gs2
4eli4e
ell2es2
el4l4
4ello
4elo
elove2
elov3er2
4el2s.
4els4e
elses3k4
els2es
4els2f4
els2ti4n
elst2
elst4i
els1tr4a
elst4r
els1tæn2k4
elv1eje
elvej4
4elæ
2em
3emalj4
em4a
emal4
eme2n2s1
em1en2
em2e3ri
em1er
1emes4e
em2es
em1et
em3eu
emme5r1en2
emm1er
emm4e2re
3emne
emors1k4
emo2rs
4emæ
en2
2e1n4a
4e3na.
e3nae
4e3nan1n
ena4n
e3na2r.
ena6r
4e3nas
5e4nas2p4
e3na2t
4enatu
4e3nau
4enav4n
2e1n2d.
en3d4a
2e1ndb4
2e1n2dd4
2e5nd1eks
e4n1de
ende4k4
3en2den2
enden3d
2e3ndf4
2e1ndg
e1ndh
en3dj4
4end2k4
2e1ndl4
2e1ndm
e1nd2n
en5do
e1n6do4g.
en2do2g
2end2p4
en3d4r
2e1n2ds
2e1n2d2t
en3du
e1ndv
2e5ndw
e1ndz
en5dø4
en3då4
4e1ne
e4n3e2dd4
en2ed
e4n3eft
enef4
e3neli
en2el4
e4n3emb4
en2em
e3n3e2n2
e2nend
5e4ne2nm
en3er
e3n3e2r.
en2e3ri
6en4e5ris
6en4eros
en2e1r4o
6en6ero2t
e3ner4t
en2es2
en3et
5en2e1t4a
en4e3th
en4e3t4r
e3ne2ts
e3ne2t2t
4e1né
4e3nè1
1engl4
en2g
1engs2p4
en4gs
2e1ni
4e3ni4a
4e3ni2c2
4e3nid4
4e3ni4e
e3nig
e3ni2k4
e3nil4
4e3n2i2n.
eni4n
4e3nio2g
4e3ni2p4
4e3ni4r
4e3nis
4e3ni2t
4e3niu
4eniv
1enke
en2k4
ennis1
en1n
en3ni
e3no.
4e3no4a
2e3nob4
4e3no2c2
4eno2g
e1no2k4
2enol4
2e1nom
2e3no2n
2e1nor
4e1nos2
4e3no2t
2e1nov
6e3nov6es2
ens1k4a2k4
e2n2s
ensk4
ensk4a
en2s1ken2
ens3kr4o
ens1kr2
ens1tæ
enst2
en2t1eg1e
e2n4t
ente4g
3entio
ent4i
2enu
4e3nu4a
4e1nue
4e3nug
4e3nui
e3num
4e1nus
e1nu4t
4e3nü
2e1n4y4
2e1næ
2e1nø4
3e2nø.
e3nød
e3nøg
2e1nål4
enå4
4eo
eog6e1ne4
eo2g
eog1e
eoge2n2
eov3e4
1epaul4
e2p4
ep4a
2epi2s.
1epi2t
4epl4
1epo2k4
2eq
2e1r4a
4e5ra.
4eraad
e2r4a4a
e3ra2c2
4e5race
4erado
e5ra2ds
3e2radv
e3ra1fo
e2raf4
4era4gh
e2ra2g
4e3rag4o
4era2k.
era2k4
e2r4ak4a
e5raki
4erale
eral4
6e3ramt
4era2n.
era4n
e4rangi
eran2g
e2rano
4e3ra2r.
e2ra6r
4e5rass4e
e2ra2s1s
e2rav
er1än1
2e1re
4er4e.
erebs3
er4eb4
e2r3e2dd4
er2ed
er1eg4o
ere4g
4e2reig
er2ei
er1ej2ed
e2reje
erej4
6er4ekl4
ere4k4
6ereko
e2r3elb4
er2el4
e2r3ele
4ereli
e2r3els
e4r5emb4
er2em
e2r3em2p4
e3r1en2
6ere2n.
ere2nd
5e4r2entu
ere2n4t
4ere2r.
er1e2r
er2e3r4a
erer4el4
2e1r4e1re
er5e3r2em
3er2erh
e2r2er4k4
e2r2e3r4o
4er4e2s.
er2es
e2r3esk4
4ere2s1s
4er1et
e2r3e3t4a
5e2r3e2tud
er2e3tu
e2r1ex
4e1ré
er4gs2
er2g
2e1ri
4eri.
4eri4a
4e3ri2c2
4e3rid2s.
erid4
eri2ds
3e2ridse2ts2
erids4e
e2rid4y4
4eri4e
4erif4
4erig
4erimi
3e2rim2p4
4erimu
4e4rimå4
4er2i2n.
eri4n
4erin2g
5e4ring2e1ni
ering1e
eringe2n2
4erino
e4ri2n4t
e3rio
4eri4r
4eris
e5risk4
3ermi
3ermo
2e1r4o
6ero.
6erobo
erob4
3e4robs2
6ero2c2
e5ro4e
e2rof4
4e3rofo
6erol4
6erom4a
e2rom
4ero2n
e4ror
6e5ro2r.
4er4o1r4o
4eros
6ero2t
4erovi
e2rov
e3rov2k4
3erov4n
e3rovo
e3rov4s
e1ró
2erö
5erri2t
er4r
5er2ror
err4o
5erræn
er2s3kl4
e2rs
ersk4
ert4e3r4a
er4t
ert1e2r
2eru
4e1ru.
e1rub4
e1ru2c2
3erugl4
e1rui
4e1rum
4e1rune2
eru2n
e1run1n
e3ru2p4
3erupt4i
4e3rus
5e4rusu
4e1ru4t
2ervst3e
ervs1t2
erv4s
2ervst4o
2e3r4y4
4ery.
2e1ræ
3eræb4
3e2ræg2
4eræk4
e1rø4
4e5rød
2e3røg
2erøm
2erør
4erøs2
2erøv
erøve2
4e1råd
erå4
2es
4e2s.
e4s2c2
4es2k.
esk4
e1sk4eski
2es2k2es
eskesk4
4eski
es3kjæ
eskj4
es1k4o2k4
4eskr2
es2st4a
e2s1s
esst2
es3s2t4r
est4
es2t4a
es1tab.
estab4
es4th
es3tid4
est4i
es3toft
est4o
es2tof4
es3tow
